Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-140b of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Public Safety shall establish and maintain
a pursuit alert system to alert drivers of active police pursuits
occurring in their immediate area. The alert system shall include,
but shall not be limited to, the following components:
1. Collaboration with mobile carriers and notification services
to send real-time alerts directly to drivers' mobile phones via text
messages, push notifications, or other mobile communication methods;
Req. No. 10235 Page 1

2. Integration with any existing highway electronic message
boards in the area to display real-time updates about the location
and direction of an active pursuit;
3. Limitation on the area of notification to a radius around
the pursuit to be determined by the Department.
B. Alerts of a pursuit shall only be issued when a law
enforcement agency confirms that an active pursuit is ongoing, and
that pursuit poses a significant risk to the public and when public
notification is deemed likely to reduce the risk of harm or assist
in the safe resolution of the pursuit.
C. The pursuit alert system shall provide clear, concise and
timely information about the pursuit, such as the make, model, and
color of the vehicle, its last known location, and direction of
travel. Notifications shall be issued in a manner that minimizes
driver distraction and promotes safety. Alerts shall be deactivated
once the pursuit has ended or is no longer a threat to public
safety.
D. The Department is authorized to promulgate any rules
necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10235 JBH 12/12/24


Req. No. 10235 Page 2